Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Municipal Zoning Outside Boundaries

13-7-301. Prerequisites to plan or ordinance requiring subdivider to install curbs, gutters or sidewalks — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding this part and part 2 of this chapter to the contrary, no municipality or regional planning commission shall adopt any plan, ordinance or rule which would require a subdivider, whose proposed subdivision is outside the corporate limits of any municipality located within the regional planning district, to install curbs, gutters, or sidewalks, unless both public water and sewage systems are to be made available within eighteen (18) months after the subdivider requests approval of the subdivider's plan of subdivision. This section shall not apply to counties having the following populations according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

not less than nor more than

276,000 277,000

700,000 800,000

or to counties with a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1978, ch. 942, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 13-717.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Borrow excavations, exemption of certain road work construction from local and regional zoning and planning regulations, § 54-1-128.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of city zoning and planning outside city limits, OAG 98-064, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (3/17/98).

Extraterritorial zoning by cities under county growth plan, OAG 99-218, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/4/99).

Right of municipality to separate planning region designation; right of municipality to provide zoning and subdivision regulations outside corporate limits but within urban growth boundaries, OAG 99-227, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 229 (12/6/99).

Extraterritorial city zoning, OAG 00-032, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (2/28/00).

13-7-302. Establishment of zones or districts outside municipality.

Power is hereby granted to the chief legislative body of any municipality to establish by ordinance zones or districts in territory adjoining but outside of such municipality and lying within planning regions in which the municipal planning commission has been designated as the regional planning commission under § 13-3-102, and in which territory the county has no zoning already in force; provided, that prior to final enactment of such ordinance, six (6) months' notice of intent shall have been filed with the county mayor of the county or counties within which the municipality and/or region lies. Within such zones or districts, the municipality may, by ordinance regulate the location, height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of lot occupancy, the required open spaces, the density of population and the uses of land, buildings, and structures.

Acts 1959, ch. 217, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 13-711; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Establishment of foreign trade zones, title 7, ch. 85.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257.

13-7-303. Notice of intent to adopt ordinance — Zoning plans — Public hearing — Notice by publication.

Before adopting the regional ordinance covering territory outside the municipality and which is not then zoned by the county, the county mayor shall be given at least six (6) months' notice of the interest and intent of the municipality to adopt such ordinance. A letter signed jointly by the mayor of such municipality and the chair of the regional planning commission and delivered to the county mayor by registered or certified mail shall be considered sufficient notice. Upon preparation of the zoning plan by the regional planning commission and certification of same to the chief legislative body of the municipality, the chief legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon, at least fifteen (15) days' notice of the time and place of which shall be published in the official municipal journal or in a newspaper of general circulation in the affected region.

Acts 1959, ch. 217, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 13-712; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

13-7-304. Board of appeals — Creation — Members, appointment — Terms.

In adopting the regional zoning ordinance, the chief legislative body of the municipality shall create a board of zoning appeals consisting of three (3) or five (5) members, a majority of whom shall be residents of the territory subject to the regional zoning provisions, and who shall be appointed for terms of such length and so arranged that the term of one (1) member shall expire each year.

Acts 1959, ch. 217, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-713.

13-7-305. Application of part 2 of this chapter.

The terms of the municipal zoning regulations as appearing in part 2 of this chapter shall apply except as specifically otherwise provided in this part.

Acts 1959, ch. 217, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-714.

13-7-306. Effect of adoption of county zoning.

In any county in which regional zoning has been adopted under this part, whenever the county legislative body adopts county zoning to cover at least such regional area and has provided for the administration and enforcement thereof, then and thereby the zoning provided for such regional area under this part is automatically superseded and repealed.

Acts 1959, ch. 217, § 5; 1963, ch. 374, § 1; 1967, ch. 11, § 1; 1970, ch. 535, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 13-715.

Attorney General Opinions. Extraterritorial zoning by cities under county growth plan, OAG 99-218, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/4/99).